utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 лана .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 лани .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 аеја .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 0 арските .
SFX 1996 Y 1
SFX 1996 0 веа .
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 0 вев .
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 0 вел .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 вен .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 јата .
SFX 2134 Y 1
SFX 2134 0 енува .
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 0 ичарскиот .
SFX 2514 Y 1
SFX 2514 0 тав .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 так .
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 0 тал .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 там .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 тан .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 ежот .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 чнине .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 ур .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 ус .
SFX 2438 Y 1
SFX 2438 0 ут .
SFX 4629 Y 1
SFX 4629 0 вови .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 тичкава .
SFX 1163 Y 1
SFX 1163 0 уш .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 вово .
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 0 шиќ .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 0 чина .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 чине .
SFX 4565 Y 1
SFX 4565 0 чини .
SFX 2245 Y 1
SFX 2245 0 пот .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 зниот .
SFX 2455 Y 1
SFX 2455 0 ностине .
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 0 ура .
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 0 ури .
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 0 арка .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 арки .
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 0 шувањана .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 ениов .
SFX 3931 Y 1
SFX 3931 0 арното .
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 0 енион .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 зми .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 ините .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 0 искине .
SFX 3973 Y 1
SFX 3973 0 итети .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 ќев .
SFX 4951 Y 1
SFX 4951 0 тони .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 тоно .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 икав .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 чуваш .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 чувај .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 телот .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 стри .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 нџија .
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 0 ниот .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 нскине .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 ализација .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 ална .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 ални .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 ално .
SFX 3954 Y 1
SFX 3954 0 чаров .
SFX 3341 Y 1
SFX 3341 0 етар .
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 0 етат .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 носта .
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 0 ности .
SFX 2516 Y 1
SFX 2516 0 лер .
SFX 2335 Y 1
SFX 2335 0 лет .
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 0 лец .
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 0 леј .
SFX 4977 Y 1
SFX 4977 0 итка .
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 0 орување .
SFX 2701 Y 1
SFX 2701 0 сноно .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 ичнана .
SFX 3476 Y 1
SFX 3476 0 иштено .
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 0 лите .
SFX 1436 Y 1
SFX 1436 0 рете .
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 0 акова .
SFX 2224 Y 1
SFX 2224 0 акови .
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 0 ствените .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 вното .
SFX 767 Y 1
SFX 767 0 ницата .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 вевте .
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 0 анкана .
SFX 4166 Y 1
SFX 4166 0 товине .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 сувањено .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 олев .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 олен .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 шала .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 шале .
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 0 шало .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 ика .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 0 ики .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 0 ико .
SFX 2483 Y 1
SFX 2483 0 чник .
SFX 3917 Y 1
SFX 3917 0 нината .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 шувајте .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 алното .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 стичката .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 0 ников .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 никон .
SFX 4739 Y 1
SFX 4739 0 дуваниот .
SFX 4892 Y 1
SFX 4892 0 пивме .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 ањето .
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 0 днине .
SFX 3872 Y 1
SFX 3872 0 арството .
SFX 4865 Y 1
SFX 4865 0 анцине .
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 0 енти .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 нувањата .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 0 чева .
SFX 534 Y 1
SFX 534 0 чеви .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 чево .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 реал .
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 нче .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 нчо .
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 0 ствава .
SFX 4653 Y 1
SFX 4653 0 дба .
SFX 3064 Y 1
SFX 3064 0 нарски .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 нова .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 нови .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 ново .
SFX 1466 Y 1
SFX 1466 0 тела .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 теле .
SFX 693 Y 1
SFX 693 0 тели .
SFX 2024 Y 1
SFX 2024 0 тело .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 0 ираш .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 ичев .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 ирај .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 ичен .
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 0 ченце .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 ревме .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 ичните .
SFX 2244 Y 1
SFX 2244 0 тво .
SFX 1567 Y 1
SFX 1567 0 ичноста .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 ињава .
SFX 1068 Y 1
SFX 1068 0 ванана .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 ализира .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 рувавте .
SFX 3890 Y 1
SFX 3890 0 ениците .
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 0 неаја .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 вајте .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 стиве .
SFX 1557 Y 1
SFX 1557 0 рив .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 0 рие .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 рии .
SFX 1496 Y 1
SFX 1496 0 рил .
SFX 2170 Y 1
SFX 2170 0 рин .
SFX 3487 Y 1
SFX 3487 0 анките .
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 0 вањата .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 ута .
SFX 2642 Y 1
SFX 2642 0 ути .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 џика .
SFX 1580 Y 1
SFX 1580 0 бата .
SFX 1300 Y 1
SFX 1300 0 зов .
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 0 зон .
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 0 жат .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 неа .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 нев .
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 нее .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 нел .
SFX 3178 Y 1
SFX 3178 0 нен .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 0 олување .
SFX 4538 Y 1
SFX 4538 0 икава .
SFX 2768 Y 1
SFX 2768 0 жувањето .
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 0 арскиве .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 ошка .
SFX 4192 Y 1
SFX 4192 0 куваме .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 тост .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 јава .
SFX 4732 Y 1
SFX 4732 0 екувајте .
SFX 3118 Y 1
SFX 3118 0 ријат .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 нкана .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 скиот .
SFX 3514 Y 1
SFX 3514 0 тките .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 пуваме .
SFX 4759 Y 1
SFX 4759 0 орениот .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 ренана .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 ген .
SFX 4670 Y 1
SFX 4670 0 гу .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 омир .
SFX 1623 Y 1
SFX 1623 0 осуваат .
SFX 4927 Y 1
SFX 4927 0 евиот .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 атата .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 диме .
SFX 3292 Y 1
SFX 3292 0 левме .
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 0 сност .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 иниве .
SFX 2588 Y 1
SFX 2588 0 нцине .
SFX 1539 Y 1
SFX 1539 0 тираат .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 едувањата .
SFX 3152 Y 1
SFX 3152 0 шана .
SFX 3808 Y 1
SFX 3808 0 аска .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 шани .
SFX 3151 Y 1
SFX 3151 0 шано .
SFX 1029 Y 1
SFX 1029 0 ваните .
SFX 4800 Y 1
SFX 4800 0 чанине .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 0 вник .
SFX 3373 Y 1
SFX 3373 0 има .
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 0 име .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 ими .
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 0 шната .
SFX 4495 Y 1
SFX 4495 0 јален .
SFX 1373 Y 1
SFX 1373 0 овит .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 ович .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 овиќ .
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 0 ерче .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 графија .
SFX 1112 Y 1
SFX 1112 0 цијата .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 логот .
SFX 3983 Y 1
SFX 3983 0 жнана .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 лење .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 раноно .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 0 рувањата .
SFX 4194 Y 1
SFX 4194 0 ковиот .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 лива .
SFX 1439 Y 1
SFX 1439 0 ливе .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 ливи .
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 0 ливо .
SFX 1182 Y 1
SFX 1182 0 рева .
SFX 4687 Y 1
SFX 4687 0 чарскиот .
SFX 1296 Y 1
SFX 1296 0 реви .
SFX 2334 Y 1
SFX 2334 0 мер .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 мет .
SFX 4278 Y 1
SFX 4278 0 пнеа .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 пнев .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 пнел .
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 0 вново .
SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 0 рџија .
SFX 4928 Y 1
SFX 4928 0 дивте .
SFX 1793 Y 1
SFX 1793 0 тена .
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 0 тени .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 тено .
SFX 4043 Y 1
SFX 4043 0 жила .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 жиле .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 жило .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 еја .
SFX 3317 Y 1
SFX 3317 0 авање .
SFX 1339 Y 1
SFX 1339 0 нките .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 уваме .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 кавиот .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 мата .
SFX 3554 Y 1
SFX 3554 0 јаци .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 метри .
SFX 2371 Y 1
SFX 2371 0 рените .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 инското .
SFX 1116 Y 1
SFX 1116 0 ичкава .
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 0 алново .
SFX 4048 Y 1
SFX 4048 0 ереа .
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 0 ерев .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 ерел .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 ерен .
SFX 484 Y 1
SFX 484 0 ањево .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 изираат .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 увач .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 уваш .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 увај .
SFX 2278 Y 1
SFX 2278 0 рскиов .
