utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
вај/2,9,14,25,81,87,88,92,95,105,110,116,158,159,162,181,195,218,266,334,352,357,390,392,455,510,548,566,655,675,1072,1159,1380,1751,2062,2411,3872,4080
арм/2,93,116,209,223,224,294,296,350,391,473,702,805,811,907,1004,1122,1128,1163,1206,1331,1340,1510,1586,1602,1657,1677,1824,2153,2154,2199,2597,3312,3840
рет/50,83,90,92,153,167,176,179,180,192,206,327,329,360,367,496,509,573,663,759,783,936,1120,1121,1126,1144,1163,1200,1265,1461,2027,2338,3162
спе/7,10,19,90,92,96,156,166,176,194,316,341,377,573,623,736,883,916,1184,1203,1297,1344,1357,1418,1431,1476,1637,1825,1995,2440,2612,3182,3607,3836,4164,4629,4647
раш/9,31,50,80,90,93,97,107,108,153,156,197,269,310,352,359,531,538,569,775,784,1004,1082,1133,1288,1313,1362,1404,1449,1516,1520,1525,1546,1686,1973,2031,2033,2049,2307,2408,2519,3341,3404,4072,4139,4435,4615
љубе/1031,1196,1346,1687,1947,2050,2247,2596,2714,3297,3528,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255
доко/17,32,575,617,660,750,1186,1297,1365,1470,1505,1513,1531,1692,1825,1860,1996,2161,2487
блек/2,3,15,35,158,181,191,233,241,258,259,289,295,297,1531,3617
срам/2,3,5,8,13,14,20,21,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,80,81,89,94,101,106,111,142,143,160,161,166,170,171,190,191,214,232,251,293,314,315,322,444,529,641,828,871,1334,1492,1493,1742,1802,2038,3686
кари/206,452,569,624,644,1141,1245,1301,1554,1579,1929,2639,4578
спот/233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,322,334,1200,1301,1834,2344,2360,3378,3614,3841,3974,4536,4632
грим/294,296,918,2524,3840
смис/31,33,172,293,395,419,481,495,521,523,524,713,714,923,940,989,1220,1221,1222,1223,1224,1225,1226,1227,1438,1439,1524,1651,1684,1746,2108,2618,2727,2728,3181,3291,3292,3782,4602
трон/314,315,1243,2257,2514,3334,4072
блан/39,2514,2894,3017,4648
квин/4,110,382,1984,2429,3115,3559
осве/4,27,46,221,263,413,654,656,879,960,1215,1289,1314,1466,1583,1618,1641,1928,1983,2024,2025,2035,2086,2087,2095,2096,2104,2130,2169,2227,2400,2401,2415,2484,2491,2866,2898,3040,3155,3374,3581,3768,3770,3831,4043,4308,4542,4883,4884,4986
улич/5,7,8,35,47,50,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,83,166,167,170,192,218,327,329,360,367,390,510,566,1976
поли/502,853,998,1112,1300,1318,1347,1355,1364,1369,1396,1467,1484,1539,1591,1595,1662,1731,1736,1946,2046,2077,2177,2271,2306,2334,2399,2458,2627,2660,2783,2784,2865,2881,2918,2953,2954,3200,3400,3563,3600,3879,3880,3881,3882,3905,4089,4107,4307,4393,4433,4642,4646,4694,4953,4968
мати/526,534,988,1802,2583,2863
лока/693,1983,2438
роде/9,38,508,1024
степ/97,288,290,372,673,1036,1046,1070,1071,1137,1680,1709,1826,1940,2134,2269,3049,3582
месе/98,213,526,813,834,891,1124,1161,1281,1388,1389,1390,1391,1392,1393,1394,1395,1456,1465,1626,1672,1766,2483,2549,2583,2863,3103,3433,3510,3954,4220,4432,4565,4687
кафеа/1174,1285,1312,1327,3727
раско/17,555,575,617,660,694,1297,1370,1431,1471,1486,1531,1573,1825,1860,1996,2130,2146,2161,3040,3207,4347
панто/172,2619
парни/176,573,648,813,891,938,1124,1144,1161,1281,1388,1389,1390,1391,1392,1393,1394,1395
копан/1812,2773,3218,3848
садов/767
наста/79,342,392,500,508,541,671,718,750,826,847,905,924,931,941,1024,1038,1057,1117,1146,1186,1208,1282,1297,1365,1431,1474,1527,1563,1639,1673,1736,2046,2160,2230,2245,2720,3014,3015,3034,3208,3209,3246,3247,3248,3249,3250,3284,3285,3286,3287,3288,3603,3742,3759,4007,4027,4280,4579,4643,4892,4956
доцент/149,1286,1358
реакци/3,20,21,24,26,28,29,43,59,138,144,149,157,186,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,433,870,902,1180,1290,1446,1784,4518,4519
диктат/3,6,1286,1358,4221
вложува/1,2,5,8,12,13,18,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,56,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,100,104,105,176,303,313,349,380,476,488,489,492,493,567,618,729,864,1042,1043,1044,1045,1818,2141,2142,2165
одговор/2,3,5,6,8,9,13,14,20,21,26,27,28,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,80,89,90,93,102,106,109,143,152,158,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,180,184,188,189,196,197,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,269,293,300,311,316,323,338,345,389,410,455,1237,1506,2455,2456,2751,4077
пингпонг/218,566
